California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(3) For the 2028–29 fiscal year and every two years thereafter, the department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall, on or before May 1 of the fiscal year immediately preceding the applicable fiscal year, adjust the cannabis excise tax rate upon purchasers of cannabis or cannabis products imposed in paragraph (1) by the additional percentage of the gross receipts of any retail sale by a cannabis retailer that the department estimates will generate an amount of revenue equivalent to the amount that would have been collected in the previous fiscal year pursuant to the weight-based cultivation tax imposed under Section 34012 as it read on June 29, 2022. In no case shall the cannabis excise tax exceed 19 percent of the gross receipts of retail sale. The department shall round the rate calculated under this subdivision to the nearest one-quarter of 1 percent. The adjusted rate
 shall become operative the following July 1.

(4) On or before May 1, 2028, and each May 1 every two years thereafter, the department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall estimate the amount of revenue that would have been collected in the previous fiscal year pursuant to the weight-based cultivation tax imposed under Section 34012 as it read on June 29, 2022. The department shall estimate this amount by projecting the revenue from weight-based cultivation taxes that would have been collected in the previous calendar year based on information available to the department, including, but not limited to, information in the track and trace system required pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 26067) of Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code,
 or any implementing regulations, as a percentage of gross receipts from the retail sale of cannabis and cannabis products by cannabis retailers in the previous calendar year. 

(b) A purchaser’s liability for the cannabis excise tax is not extinguished until the cannabis excise tax has been paid to this state, except that an invoice, receipt, or other document from a cannabis retailer given to the purchaser pursuant to this section is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the invoice, receipt, or other document refers.

(c) A cannabis retailer shall be responsible for collecting the cannabis excise tax from the purchaser and remitting that tax to the department in accordance with this
 division.

(d) The cannabis retailer shall provide each purchaser with an invoice, receipt, or other document that separately states the cannabis excise tax.

(e) The cannabis excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to the sales and use tax imposed by the state and local governments.

(f) Gross receipts from the sale of cannabis or cannabis products for purposes of assessing the sales and use taxes under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) shall include the tax levied pursuant to this section.

(g) Cannabis or cannabis products shall not be sold to a purchaser unless the cannabis excise tax imposed by this section has been paid by the
 purchaser at the time of sale.

(h) This section shall not be construed to impose a cannabis excise tax upon medicinal cannabis, or medicinal cannabis product, donated for no consideration to a medicinal cannabis patient pursuant to Section 26071 of the Business and Professions Code.

(i) (1) This section shall not be construed to impose a cannabis excise tax upon cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that sells cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the
 Business and Professions Code shall be liable for the cannabis excise tax imposed by this section as if the person were a cannabis retailer at the time of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 564)   Effective September 22, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.    Repealed conditionally as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.

(a) (1) Effective January 1, 2018, and before July 1, 2022, there is hereby imposed a cultivation tax on all harvested cannabis that enters the commercial market upon all cultivators. The tax shall be due after the cannabis is harvested and enters the commercial market.

(A) The tax for cannabis flowers shall be nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) per dry-weight ounce.

(B) The tax for cannabis leaves shall be set at two dollars and seventy-five cents ($2.75) per dry-weight ounce.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the cultivation tax imposed by this subdivision shall not apply to harvested cannabis that enters the commercial market and no tax collection is required pursuant to subdivision (h) if any of the following apply:

(A) The harvested cannabis was first sold or transferred by a cultivator to a manufacturer on or after July 1, 2022.

(B) The harvested cannabis was first sold or transferred by a cultivator to a distributor on or after July 1, 2022.

(C) The harvested cannabis, or cannabis products containing that harvested cannabis, was first sold or transferred by a microbusiness to a distributor or manufacturer that arranges for laboratory testing pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code on or after July 1, 2022.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the suspension of the cultivation tax imposed by paragraph (2) apply only to cannabis that is ultimately subject, at retail sale as either cannabis or as cannabis products
 containing the harvested cannabis, to the cannabis excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 34011.2.

(b) The department may adjust the tax rate for cannabis leaves annually to reflect fluctuations in the relative price of cannabis flowers to cannabis leaves.

(c) The department may from time to time establish other categories of harvested cannabis, categories for unprocessed or frozen cannabis or immature plants, or cannabis that is shipped directly to manufacturers. These categories shall be taxed at their relative value compared with cannabis flowers.

(d) The department may prescribe by regulation a method and manner for payment of the cultivation tax that utilizes tax stamps or state-issued product bags that indicate that all required tax has been paid on the product to which the tax stamp is
 affixed or in which the cannabis is packaged.

(e) The tax stamps and product bags shall be of the designs, specifications, and denominations as may be prescribed by the department and may be purchased by any licensee under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) Subsequent to the establishment of a tax stamp program, the department may by regulation provide that cannabis shall not be removed from a licensed cultivation facility or transported on a public highway unless in a state-issued product bag bearing a tax stamp in the proper denomination.

(g) The tax stamps and product bags shall be capable of being read by a scanning or similar device and must be traceable utilizing the track and trace system pursuant to Section 26068 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) Cultivators shall be responsible for payment of the tax pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. A cultivator’s liability for the tax is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to this state except that an invoice, receipt, or other document from a distributor or manufacturer given to the cultivator pursuant to paragraph (3) is sufficient to relieve the cultivator from further liability for the tax to which the invoice, receipt, or other document refers. Cannabis shall not be sold unless the tax has been paid as provided in this part.

(1) A distributor shall collect the cultivation tax from a cultivator on all harvested cannabis that enters the commercial market. This paragraph shall not apply where a cultivator is not required to send, and does not send, the harvested cannabis to a distributor.

(2) (A) A manufacturer shall collect the cultivation tax from a cultivator on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed cannabis by a cultivator to a manufacturer. The manufacturer shall remit the cultivation tax collected on the cannabis product sold or transferred to a distributor for quality assurance, inspection, and testing, as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code. This paragraph shall not apply where a distributor collects the cultivation tax from a cultivator pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the department may prescribe a substitute method and manner for collection and remittance of the cultivation tax under this paragraph, including a method and manner for collection of the cultivation tax by a distributor.

(3) A distributor or manufacturer shall provide to the cultivator, and a
 distributor that collects the cultivation tax from a manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (2) shall provide to the manufacturer, an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that identifies the licensee receiving the product, the cultivator from which the product originates, including the associated unique identifier, the amount of cultivation tax, and any other information deemed necessary by the department. The department may authorize other forms of documentation under this paragraph.

(4) The department may adopt regulations prescribing procedures for the refund of cultivation tax collected on cannabis or cannabis product that fails quality assurance, inspection, and testing as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code.

(i) All cannabis removed from a cultivator’s premises, except for plant waste or medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products
 designated for donation, shall be presumed to be sold and thereby taxable under this section, except as otherwise exempt pursuant to Section 34012.2.

(j) The tax imposed by this section shall be imposed on all cannabis cultivated in the state pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department, but shall not apply to cannabis cultivated for personal use under Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code or cultivated by a qualified patient or primary caregiver in accordance with the Compassionate Use Act of 1996 (Proposition 215), found in Section 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) (1) For the 2020 calendar year, the rates set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be adjusted by the department for inflation.

(2) For the 2021 calendar year, the rates shall be those
 imposed for the 2020 calendar year in paragraph (1) and shall not be adjusted for inflation unless the adjustment is for an inflation rate that is less than zero.

(3) For the 2022 calendar year,
 until July 1, 2022, the rates shall be those imposed for the 2021 calendar year in paragraph (2) and shall be adjusted by the department for inflation.

(l) The Department of Cannabis Control is not responsible for enforcing any provisions of the cultivation tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 23.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.  \n\n   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.     See later operative version as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.

(a) Effective January 1, 2018, there is hereby imposed a cultivation tax on all harvested cannabis that enters the commercial market upon all cultivators. The tax shall be due after the cannabis is harvested and enters the commercial market.

(1) The tax for cannabis flowers shall be nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) per dry-weight ounce.

(2) The tax for cannabis leaves shall be set at two dollars and seventy-five cents ($2.75) per dry-weight ounce.

(b) The department may adjust the tax rate for cannabis leaves annually to reflect fluctuations in the relative price of cannabis flowers to cannabis leaves.

(c) The department may from time to time establish other categories of harvested cannabis, categories for unprocessed or frozen cannabis or immature plants, or cannabis that is shipped directly to manufacturers. These categories shall be taxed at their relative value compared with cannabis flowers.

(d) The department may prescribe by regulation a method and manner for payment of the cultivation tax that utilizes tax stamps or state-issued product bags that indicate that all required tax has been paid on the product to which the tax stamp is affixed or in which the cannabis is packaged.

(e) The tax stamps and product bags shall be of the designs, specifications, and denominations as may be prescribed by the department and may be purchased by any licensee under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business
 and Professions Code.

(f) Subsequent to the establishment of a tax stamp program, the department may by regulation provide that cannabis shall not be removed from a licensed cultivation facility or transported on a public highway unless in a state-issued product bag bearing a tax stamp in the proper denomination.

(g) The tax stamps and product bags shall be capable of being read by a scanning or similar device and must be traceable utilizing the track and trace system pursuant to Section 26068 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) Cultivators shall be responsible for payment of the tax pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. A cultivator’s liability for the tax is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to this state except that an invoice, receipt, or other document from a distributor or
 manufacturer given to the cultivator pursuant to paragraph (3) is sufficient to relieve the cultivator from further liability for the tax to which the invoice, receipt, or other document refers. Cannabis shall not be sold unless the tax has been paid as provided in this part.

(1) A distributor shall collect the cultivation tax from a cultivator on all harvested cannabis that enters the commercial market. This paragraph shall not apply where a cultivator is not required to send, and does not send, the harvested cannabis to a distributor.

(2) (A) A manufacturer shall collect the cultivation tax from a cultivator on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed cannabis by a cultivator to a manufacturer. The manufacturer shall remit the cultivation tax collected on the cannabis product sold or transferred to a distributor for quality assurance, inspection, and
 testing, as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code. This paragraph shall not apply where a distributor collects the cultivation tax from a cultivator pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the department may prescribe a substitute method and manner for collection and remittance of the cultivation tax under this paragraph, including a method and manner for collection of the cultivation tax by a distributor.

(3) A distributor or manufacturer shall provide to the cultivator, and a distributor that collects the cultivation tax from a manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (2) shall provide to the manufacturer, an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that identifies the licensee receiving the product, the cultivator from which the product originates, including the associated unique identifier, the amount of cultivation tax, and any
 other information deemed necessary by the department. The department may authorize other forms of documentation under this paragraph.

(4) The department may adopt regulations prescribing procedures for the refund of cultivation tax collected on cannabis or cannabis product that fails quality assurance, inspection, and testing as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code.

(i) All cannabis removed from a cultivator’s premises, except for plant waste or medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products designated for donation, shall be presumed to be sold and thereby taxable under this section, except as otherwise exempt pursuant to Section 34012.2.

(j) The tax imposed by this section shall be imposed on all cannabis cultivated in the state pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department, but shall not apply to cannabis cultivated for personal use under Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code or cultivated by a qualified patient or primary caregiver in accordance with the Compassionate Use Act of 1996 (Proposition 215), found in Section 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) (1) For the 2020 calendar year, the rates set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be adjusted by the department for inflation.

(2) For the 2021 calendar year, the rates shall be those imposed for the 2020 calendar year in paragraph (1) and shall not be adjusted for inflation unless the adjustment is for an inflation rate that is less
 than zero.

(3) For the 2022 calendar year, the rates shall be those imposed for the 2021 calendar year in paragraph (2) and shall be adjusted by the department for inflation.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2023, the rates imposed for the previous calendar year shall be adjusted by the department annually for inflation.

(l) The Department of Cannabis Control is not responsible for enforcing any provisions of the cultivation tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 113.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: Pursuant to conditions prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41, this version would resume operation, by reversion, on the inoperative date of the amendment by Stats. 2022,  Ch. 56.  This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 34012, on and after the operative date of the act adding this section, the cultivation tax shall not be imposed on medicinal cannabis designated for donation by a cultivator in the track and trace system.

(b) A person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that certifies in writing that medicinal cannabis or a medicinal cannabis
 product will be donated to a medicinal cannabis patient and sells or uses the medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product in some manner or for some purpose other than donation, shall be liable for the taxes under this part. The certification in writing shall relieve the cultivator that donates the medicinal cannabis from liability for the taxes imposed and shall relieve the distributor from liability for the taxes required to be collected under this part, only if the certification is taken in good faith.

(c) A distributor or manufacturer shall not collect or remit the cultivation tax for medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products designated for donation by a cultivator.

(d) A cultivator shall keep records of any medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products designated for donation.

(e) Nothing in
 this part shall be construed to impose a cultivation tax upon medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products designated for donation.

(f) For purposes of this section, “medicinal cannabis” and “medicinal cannabis product” shall mean cannabis and cannabis product, as defined in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code, intended for use pursuant to the Compassionate Use Act of 1996 (Proposition 215), found in Section 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code, by a medicinal cannabis patient.

(g) (1) This section shall become operative upon completion of the necessary changes to the track and trace program in order to implement the act adding this section, as determined by the Department of Food and Agriculture, or on March 1, 2020, whichever occurs first.

(2) This section
 shall remain in effect only until five years after it becomes operative, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 837, Sec. 12.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative on or before March 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own conditions.   Repealed on the date prescribed by its own conditions.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.2.

(a) On and after January 1, 2022, there is exempt from the cultivation tax imposed pursuant to Section 34012 the cultivation of all harvested cannabis that will be, or has been, designated a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code and all harvested cannabis that is used to manufacture a cannabis product that is designated a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations prescribing the procedures for how the exemption provided in subdivision (a) shall be implemented.

(c) A person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and
 Professions Code that sells cannabis exempt from the cultivation tax pursuant to subdivision (a) or sells any cannabis product that is manufactured with cannabis exempt from the cultivation tax pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be liable for the cultivation tax imposed by Section 34012 as if the person were a cultivator of the cannabis at the time of sale.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may adopt and readopt emergency regulations to implement this section. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to emergency regulations adopted or readopted pursuant to this section. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 114.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.3.

(a) The cannabis excise tax required to be collected by a cannabis retailer, and any amount not returned to the purchaser that is not tax but was collected from the purchaser under the representation by the cannabis retailer that it was tax, constitutes debt owed by the cannabis retailer to this state.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 24.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.5.

(a) The cultivation tax and cannabis excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 34011 required to be collected by the distributor, or required to be collected by the manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 34012, and any amount unreturned to the cultivator or cannabis retailer that is not tax but was collected from the cultivator or cannabis retailer under the representation by the distributor or the manufacturer that it was tax constitute debts owed by the distributor or the manufacturer to this state.

(b) A distributor or manufacturer that has collected any amount of tax in excess of the amount of tax imposed by this part and
 actually due from a cultivator or cannabis retailer, may refund such amount to the cultivator or cannabis retailer, even though such tax amount has already been paid over to the department and no corresponding credit or refund has yet been secured. The distributor or manufacturer may claim credit for that overpayment against the amount of tax imposed by this part that is due upon any other quarterly return, providing that credit is claimed in a return dated no later than three years from the date of overpayment.

(c) Any tax collected from a cultivator, cannabis
 retailer, or purchaser that has not been remitted to the department shall be deemed a debt owed to the State of California by the person required to collect and remit the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 25.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration [34013. - 34021.5.]

34013.

(a) The department shall administer and collect the taxes imposed by this part pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)). For purposes of this part, the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the taxes imposed by this part, and references to “feepayer” shall include a person required to pay or collect the taxes imposed by this part.

(b) (1) A person licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that failed to remit amounts due by means of electronic funds transfer on and after January 1, 2022,
 and before January 1, 2023, is not subject to or is relieved of any of the penalties imposed by Section 55050 for that failure.

(2) On or after January 1, 2022, subdivision (a) of Section 55050 shall not apply to a person required to pay or collect the taxes imposed by this part on a person licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code if the department deems it necessary to facilitate the collection of amounts due.

(c) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part, including, but not limited to, collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(d) The
 department shall adopt necessary rules and regulations to administer the taxes in this part. Such rules and regulations may include methods or procedures to tag cannabis or cannabis products, or the packages thereof, to designate prior tax payment.

(e) (1) Until January 1, 2024, the department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce any emergency regulations as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce its duties under this division. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of
 Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the department may remain in effect for two years from adoption, and may be readopted in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(2) Until January 1, 2030, the department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce any emergency regulations as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce its duties added to this division by the act adding this subdivision. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section
 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the department may remain in effect for two years from adoption, and may be readopted in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. 

(f) Any person required to be licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code who fails to pay the taxes imposed under this part shall, in addition to owing the taxes not paid, be subject to a penalty of at least one-half the amount of the taxes not paid, and shall be subject to having its license revoked
 pursuant to Section 26031 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) The department may bring such legal actions as are necessary to collect any deficiency in the tax required to be paid, and, upon the department’s request, the Attorney General shall bring the actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 49.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34013.1.

Notwithstanding Sections 7056 and 55381:

(a) The department may disclose the name, business name, business city location, account number, and account status of a person registered with the department for purposes of collecting and remitting the cannabis excise tax.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall, upon written request, provide to a state and local law enforcement agency any and all information collected by the department under this part regarding a person required by this part to collect and remit the cannabis excise tax and information collected under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001). The state and local law enforcement agencies authorized by
 this subdivision shall only access and use this information to the extent necessary to carry out the functions and duties of that agency and the agency shall adhere to all state laws, policies, and regulations pertaining to the protection of personal information and individual privacy.

(2) For purposes of this section, “law enforcement agency” means the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a sheriff department, a police department, or a California state, city, county, or city and county agency or department designated by the governing body of that agency to enforce state cannabis laws or local cannabis ordinances and regulations.

(c) The department is authorized to share information obtained under this part and under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), with a licensing authority, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding, as deemed necessary by the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 41.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34014.

(a) (1) Until January 1, 2023, all distributors must obtain a separate permit from the department pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. No fee shall be charged to any person for issuance of the permit. Any person required to obtain a permit who engages in business as a distributor without a permit or after a permit has been canceled, suspended, or revoked, and each officer of any corporation that so engages in business, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) On and after January 1, 2023, all cannabis retailers shall obtain a separate cannabis tax permit from the department pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. A fee shall not be charged to
 any person for issuance of the permit. Any person required to obtain a permit who engages in business as a cannabis retailer without a permit or after a permit has been canceled, suspended, or revoked, and each officer of any corporation that so engages in business, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) The department may require every licensed distributor, retailer, cultivator, microbusiness, nonprofit, or other person required to be licensed, to provide security to cover the liability for taxes imposed by state law on cannabis produced or received by the distributor, retailer, cultivator, microbusiness, nonprofit, or other person required to be licensed in accordance with procedures to be established by the department. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the department may waive any security requirement it imposes for good
 cause, as determined by the department. “Good cause” includes, but is not limited to, the inability of a distributor, retailer, cultivator, microbusiness, nonprofit, or other person required to be licensed to obtain security due to a lack of service providers or the policies of service providers that prohibit service to a cannabis business.

(c) In fixing the amount of any security required by the department, the department shall give consideration to the financial hardship that may be imposed on licensees as a result of any shortage of available surety providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 50.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34014.1.

(a) Whenever any person fails to comply with any provision of this part relating to the cannabis excise tax or any rule or regulation of the department relating to the cannabis excise tax prescribed and adopted under this part, or when a person’s seller’s permit has been suspended or revoked under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), or when a person’s license has been suspended or revoked under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code, the department upon conducting a hearing, after giving the person 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring the person to show cause why the person’s permit or permits should not be revoked, may revoke or suspend any one or more of the permits held by the person. The department shall give to the
 person written notice of the suspension or revocation of any of the person’s permits. The notices herein required may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination under subdivision (d) of Section 55061 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The department shall not issue a new permit after the revocation of a permit unless it is satisfied that the former holder of the permit will comply with the provisions of this part relating to the cannabis excise tax and the regulations of the department.

(b) A person whose permit has been previously suspended or revoked shall pay the department a new issuance fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the reissuance of a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 28.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

34015.

(a) Unless otherwise prescribed by the department, the cannabis excise tax imposed by Section 34011.2 is due and payable to the department quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period of three months. On or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period, each cannabis retailer shall file a return for the preceding quarterly period with the department using electronic media prescribed by the department. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(b) The department may require every person engaged in the cultivation, distribution, manufacturing, or retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products, or any other person required to be
 licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to file, on or before the 25th day of each month, a report using electronic media prescribed by the department with respect to the person’s inventory, purchases, and sales during the preceding month and any other information as the department may require to carry out the purposes of this part. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(c) The department may examine the books and records of any person licensed, or required to be licensed, pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code, as it may deem necessary in carrying out this part.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 30.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34015.1.

(a) (1) Any unlicensed person who is required to be licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code and who possesses, keeps, stores, or retains for the purpose of sale, or sells or offers to sell any cannabis or cannabis products, shall be liable for the cultivation tax imposed pursuant to Section 34012 as if the person were the cultivator of the harvested cannabis and that cannabis entered the commercial market, the cannabis excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 34011 or 34011.2 as if the person were the purchaser of the cannabis or cannabis product in a retail sale from a cannabis retailer, and for applicable penalties and interest, if any, which shall become immediately due and payable.

(2) (A) The department shall ascertain as best it may the category and amount of the harvested cannabis deemed as having entered the commercial market, and the average market price or gross receipts, based on any information within the department’s possession or that may come into its possession, of the retail sale of the cannabis or cannabis product deemed as purchased from a cannabis retailer, and shall determine immediately the tax on that amount, adding to the tax a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, and shall give the unlicensed person notice of that determination in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 55061. However, if the department determines that the failure to secure a license was due to reasonable cause, the department may waive the penalty. Sections 55101 and 55102 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the
 determination and the right of the person to petition for a redetermination.

(B) Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall file with the department a signed statement setting forth the facts upon which they base the claim for relief. Any person who signs a statement pursuant to this section that asserts the truth of any material matter that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in the county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and the fine.

(3) If the department believes that the collection of any amount of tax required to be paid by any person under this part will be jeopardized by delay, it may make a jeopardy determination pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 55101) of Chapter 3 of Part 30.

(4) The department may collect the tax, penalty, and interest due from the person by seizure and sale of property in the manner prescribed for the collection pursuant to Section 55181.

(5) In the suit, a copy of the jeopardy determination certified by the department shall be prima facie evidence that the person is indebted to the state in the amount of the tax, penalties, and interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount, or any portion thereof, should have been reported until the date of payment.

(6) The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative.

(7) No action taken pursuant to this section relieves the person in any way from the penal provisions of this part or
 the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)).
